fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX m Y 70
SFX m ys      ys              ys        
SFX m ys      yos             ys        
SFX m ys      yis             ys        
SFX m ys      ym              ys        
SFX m ys      yn              ys        
SFX m ys      ye              ys        
SFX m ys      y               ys        
SFX m 0       que             ys        
SFX m 0       qve             ys        
SFX m 0       ne              ys        
SFX m 0       ve              ys        
SFX m 0       ue              ys          
SFX m ys      ysque           ys        
SFX m ys      ysqve           ys        
SFX m ys      ysne            ys        
SFX m ys      ysve            ys        
SFX m ys      ysue            ys          
SFX m ys      yosque          ys        
SFX m ys      yosqve          ys        
SFX m ys      yosne           ys        
SFX m ys      yosve           ys        
SFX m ys      yosue           ys          
SFX m ys      yisque          ys        
SFX m ys      yisqve          ys        
SFX m ys      yisne           ys        
SFX m ys      yisve           ys        
SFX m ys      yisue           ys          
SFX m ys      ymque           ys        
SFX m ys      ymqve           ys        
SFX m ys      ymne            ys        
SFX m ys      ymve            ys        
SFX m ys      ymue            ys          
SFX m ys      ynque           ys        
SFX m ys      ynqve           ys        
SFX m ys      ynne            ys        
SFX m ys      ynve            ys        
SFX m ys      ynue            ys          
SFX m ys      yeque           ys        
SFX m ys      yeqve           ys        
SFX m ys      yene            ys        
SFX m ys      yeve            ys        
SFX m ys      yeue            ys          
SFX m ys      yque            ys        
SFX m ys      yqve            ys        
SFX m ys      yne             ys        
SFX m ys      yve             ys        
SFX m ys      yue             ys          
SFX m y       y               y         
SFX m y       yos             y         
SFX m y       ye              y         
SFX m 0       que             y         
SFX m 0       qve             y         
SFX m 0       ne              y         
SFX m 0       ve              y         
SFX m 0       ue              y           
SFX m y       yque            y         
SFX m y       yqve            y         
SFX m y       yne             y         
SFX m y       yve             y         
SFX m y       yue             y           
SFX m y       yosque          y         
SFX m y       yosqve          y         
SFX m y       yosne           y         
SFX m y       yosve           y         
SFX m y       yosue           y           
SFX m y       yeque           y         
SFX m y       yeqve           y         
SFX m y       yene            y         
SFX m y       yeve            y         
SFX m y       yeue            y           
