fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.dic
Aepy/m
amfibrachys/m
amphibrachys/m
asty/m
Attys/m
Atys/m
botrys/m
Botrys/m
braty/m
cachrys/m
Capys/m
chamaedrys/m
chamaepitys/m
chelys/m
chrysophrys/m
Cotys/m
dasys/m
dibrachys/m
Dictys/m
Erinys/m
glicy/m
glycy/m
Halys/m
hypobraxhys/m
Itys/m
Leucophrys/m
Libys/m
lignys/m
mesobrachys/m
misy/m
moly/m
my/m
mys/m
Mys/m
napy/m
ophrys/m
ostrys/m
Othrys/m
Phorcys/m
phy/m
probrachys/m
sory/m
stachys/m
Tethys/m
Tiphys/m
trachy/m
tribrachys/m
Levcophrys/m
